Idaho, session 2025, H0253.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 74-101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-101. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Applicant" means any person formally seeking a paid or volunteer
position with a public agency. Applicant does not include any person seeking
appointment to a position normally filled by election.
(2) "Copy" means transcribing by handwriting, photocopying, duplicat-
ing machine or reproducing by any other means as long as the public record is
not altered or damaged.
(3) "Custodian" means the person or persons having personal custody and
control of the public records in question.
(4) "Independent public body corporate and politic" means the Idaho
housing and finance association as created in chapter 62, title 67, Idaho
Code.
(5) "Inspect" means the right to listen, view and make notes of public
records as long as the public record is not altered or damaged.
(6) "Investigatory record" means information with respect to an iden-
tifiable person, group of persons or entities compiled by a public agency
pursuant to its statutory authority in the course of investigating a spe-
cific act, omission, failure to act, or other conduct over which the public
agency has regulatory authority or law enforcement authority.
(7) "Law enforcement agency" means any state or local agency given law
enforcement powers or that has authority to investigate, enforce, prosecute
or punish violations of state or federal criminal statutes, ordinances or
regulations.
(8) "Local agency" means a county, city, school district, municipal
corporation, independent public body corporate and politic, district, pub-
lic health district, political subdivision, or any agency thereof, or any
committee of a local agency, or any combination thereof.
(9) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership, firm,
association, joint venture, state or local agency or any other recognized
legal entity.


(10) "Prisoner" means a person who has been convicted of a crime and is
either incarcerated or on parole for that crime or who is being held in cus-
tody for trial or sentencing.
(11) "Public agency" means any state or local agency as defined in this
section.
(12) "Public official" means any state, county, local district, inde-
pendent public body corporate and politic or governmental official or em-
ployee, whether elected, appointed or hired.
(13) "Public record" includes, but is not limited to, any writing con-
taining information relating to the conduct or administration of the pub-
lic's business prepared, owned, used or retained by any state agency, in-
dependent public body corporate and politic or local agency regardless of
physical form or characteristics. Provided, however, that personal notes
created by a public official solely for his own use shall not be a public
record as long as such personal notes are not shared with any other person or
entity.
(14) "Requester" means the person requesting examination and/or copy-
ing of public records pursuant to section 74-102, Idaho Code.
(15) "Resident" means a person whose domicile has been within Idaho con-
tinuously for a period of at least thirty (30) days, excluding a full-time
student who is a resident of another state, and shall also include a domestic
entity as provided in section 30-21-102, Idaho Code. Establishment of resi-
dency shall include a spouse and dependent children who reside with that per-
son in the domicile. A domicile shall not be a person's workplace, vacation
residence, or part-time residence.
(15) (16) "State agency" means every state officer, department, divi-
sion, bureau, commission and board or any committee of a state agency, in-
cluding those in the legislative or judicial branch, except the state mili-
tia and the Idaho state historical society library and archives.
(16) (17)(a) "Unwarranted invasion of personal privacy" means:
(i) Disclosure of information used to identify, locate, or harass
a juvenile, a victim of an alleged crime of mass violence or domes-
tic violence, or a victim of physical or sexual abuse; or
(ii) Disclosure where release of information is likely to violate
legitimate and substantial privacy interests of the person iden-
tified when such interests are weighed against general public in-
formation.
(b) Release of the name, age, sex, and hometown of any deceased person
after notification of next-of-kin shall not constitute an unwarranted
invasion of personal privacy and shall be disclosed unless otherwise
exempt under this chapter.
(17) (18) "Writing" includes, but is not limited to, handwriting, type-
writing, printing, photostating, photographing and every means of record-
ing, including letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination
thereof, and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films
and prints, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums or other documents.
SECTION 2. That Section 74-102, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


74-102. PUBLIC RECORDS -- RIGHT TO EXAMINE. (1) Every person has a
right to examine and take a copy of any public record of this state and there
is a presumption that all public records in Idaho are open at all reasonable
times for inspection except as otherwise expressly provided by statute.
(2) The right to copy public records shall include the right to make
photographs or photographic or other copies while the records are in the pos-
session of the custodian of the records using equipment provided by the pub-
lic agency or using equipment designated by the custodian.
(3) Additionally, the custodian of any public record shall give the
person, on demand, a certified copy of it if the record is of a nature permit-
ting such copying or shall furnish reasonable opportunity to inspect or copy
such record.
(4) A public agency may require that a request for public records be
submitted to it in a writing that specifically describes the subject mat-
ter and records sought, including a specific date range for when the records
sought were created. The requesting party shall be as specific as possible
when requesting records. A request shall describe records sought in suffi-
cient detail to enable the public body to locate such records with reasonable
effort. A request shall also provide the requester's name, mailing address,
e-mail email address, and telephone number, and a written declaration by the
requesting party attesting or affirming under oath whether such requester is
a resident. A request for public records and delivery of the public records
may be made by electronic mail.
(5) The custodian shall make no inquiry of any person who requests a
public record, except:
(a) To verify the identity of the requester in accordance with section
74-113, Idaho Code; or
(b) To ensure that the requested record or information will not be
used for purposes of a mailing or telephone list prohibited by section
74-120, Idaho Code, or as otherwise provided by law; or
(c) As required for purposes of protecting personal information from
disclosure under chapter 2, title 49, Idaho Code, and federal law.
(6) The custodian shall not review, examine or scrutinize any copy,
photograph or memoranda in the possession of any such person and shall extend
to the person all reasonable comfort and facility for the full exercise of
the right granted under this act.
(7) Nothing herein contained shall prevent the custodian from main-
taining such vigilance as is required to prevent alteration of any public
record while it is being examined.
(8) Examination of public records under the authority of this section
must be conducted during regular office or working hours unless the custo-
dian shall authorize examination of records in other than regular office or
working hours. In this event, the persons designated to represent the cus-
todian during such examination shall be entitled to reasonable compensation
to be paid to them by the public agency having custody of such records, out of
funds provided in advance by the person examining such records, at other than
regular office or working hours.
(9) The public agency may provide the requester information to help the
requester narrow the scope of the request or to help the requester make the


request more specific when the response to the request is likely to be volu-
minous or require payment as provided in subsection (10) of this section.
(10)(a) Except for fees that are authorized or prescribed under other
provisions of Idaho law, no fee shall be charged for the first two (2)
hours of labor in responding to a request submitted by a resident for
public records, or for copying the first one hundred (100) pages of pa-
per records that are requested by a resident.
(b) A public agency or public official may establish fees to recover
the actual labor and copying costs associated with locating and copying
documents if:
(i) The request is for more than one hundred (100) pages of paper
records; or
(ii) The request includes records from which nonpublic informa-
tion must be deleted; or
(iii) The actual labor associated with responding to requests for
public records in compliance with the provisions of this chapter
exceeds two (2) person hours.
(c) A public agency or public official may establish a separate copying
fee schedule schedules for requests submitted by residents and requests
submitted by persons who are not residents. The fee for residents may
not exceed the actual cost to the agency of copying the record if another
fee is not otherwise provided by law.
(d)(i) For providing a duplicate of a computer tape, computer
disc, microfilm or similar or analogous record system containing
public record information, a public agency or public official may
charge a fee, uniform to all persons residents, that does not ex-
ceed the sum of the following:
(i) 1. The agency's direct cost of copying the information
in that form;
(ii) 2. The standard cost, if any, for selling the same in-
formation in the form of a publication;
(iii) 3. The agency's cost of conversion, or the cost of con-
version charged by a third party, if the existing electronic
record is converted to another electronic form.
(ii) A public agency or public official may charge additional
fees, uniform to all persons who are not residents, for requests
involving duplication of a computer tape, computer disc, mi-
crofilm or similar or analogous record system containing public
record information.
(e) Fees for requests made by residents shall not exceed reasonable
labor costs necessarily incurred in responding to a public records
request. Fees, and if charged, shall reflect the personnel and quan-
tity of time that are reasonably necessary to process a request. Fees
for requests made by residents for labor costs shall be charged at the
per hour pay rate of the lowest paid administrative staff employee or
public official of the public agency who is necessary and qualified to
process the request. If a request from a resident requires redactions
to be made by an attorney who is employed by the public agency, the rate
charged shall be no more than the per hour rate of the lowest paid attor-
ney within the public agency who is necessary and qualified to process


the public records request. If a request from a resident is submitted
to a public agency that does not have an attorney on staff, and requires
redactions by an attorney, the rate shall be no more than the usual and
customary rate of the attorney who is retained by the public agency for
that purpose.
(f) The public agency shall not charge any cost or fee for copies or
labor when the requester is a resident and demonstrates that the re-
quester's examination and/or copying of public records:
(i) Is likely to contribute significantly to the public's under-
standing of the operations or activities of the government;
(ii) Is not primarily in the individual interest of the requester
including, but not limited to, the requester's interest in litiga-
tion in which the requester is or may become a party; and
(iii) Will not occur if fees are charged because the requester has
insufficient financial resources to pay such fees.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a public
agency or public official may charge fees for labor and copying costs
associated with locating and copying documents requested by a person
who is not a resident or an employee of a resident. The fee rates and
schedule for requests made by persons who are not residents or employees
of residents shall be at the discretion of the public agency or public
official as long as such fees do not exceed actual costs of the public
agency or public official.
(g) (h) Statements of fees by a public agency shall be itemized to show
the per page costs for copies, and hourly rates of employees and attor-
neys involved in responding to the request, and the actual time spent on
the public records request. No lump sum costs shall be assigned to any
public records request. If a separate fee schedule is adopted for re-
quests from persons who are not residents or employees of residents, the
separate fees for such nonresidents shall be separately identified.
(11) A requester may not file multiple requests for public records
solely to avoid payment of fees. When a public agency reasonably believes
that one (1) or more requesters is segregating a request into a series of
requests to avoid payment of fees authorized pursuant to this section, the
public agency may aggregate such requests and charge the appropriate fees.
The public agency may consider the time period in which the requests have
been made in its determination to aggregate the related requests. A public
agency shall not aggregate multiple requests on unrelated subjects from one
(1) requester.
(12) The custodian may require advance payment of fees authorized by
this section. Any money received by the public agency shall be credited to
the account for which the expense being reimbursed was or will be charged,
and such funds may be expended by the agency as part of its appropriation from
that fund. Any portion of an advance payment in excess of the actual costs of
labor and copying incurred by the agency in responding to the request shall
be returned to the requester.
(13) A public agency shall not prevent the examination or copying of a
public record by contracting with a nongovernmental body to perform any of
its duties or functions.


(14) Nothing contained herein shall prevent a public agency from dis-
closing statistical information that is descriptive of an identifiable per-
son or persons, unless prohibited by law.
(15) Nothing contained herein shall prevent a public agency from pro-
viding a copy of a public record in electronic form if the record is available
in electronic form and if the person specifically requests an electronic
copy.
(16) A public agency or elected official shall designate a custodian or
custodians for all public records, which includes any public official having
custody of, control of, or authorized access to public records and also in-
cludes all delegates of such officials, employees or representatives.
SECTION 3. That Section 74-103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-103. REQUEST AND RESPONSE TO REQUEST FOR EXAMINATION OF PUBLIC
RECORDS. (1) All requests to examine public records shall be made to the
designated custodian of such records as defined in section 74-101(3), Idaho
Code. A public agency, a public official, or an employee of a public agency
shall have no obligation and shall not be deemed to have assumed any obli-
gation to respond to a public records request that fails to comply with the
requirements of this subsection. A public records request must clearly in-
dicate that it is a public records request.
(2) A public agency or custodian shall either grant or deny a person's a
resident's request to examine or copy public records within three (3) work-
ing days of the date of the receipt of the request for examination or copy-
ing. A public agency or custodian shall either grant or deny a request from
a person who is not a resident and not employed by a resident to examine or
copy public records within twenty-one (21) days of the date of the receipt
of the request for examination or copying. If it is determined by employees
of the public agency that a longer period of time is needed to locate or re-
trieve the public records, the public agency shall so notify in writing the
person requesting to examine or copy the records and shall provide the public
records no later than ten (10) working days following the person's request,
if such person is an Idaho a resident, and no later than twenty-one (21) work-
ing thirty-five (35) days following a request from a nonresident. Provided
however, if Additionally, if it is determined that the existing electronic
record requested will first have to be converted to another electronic for-
mat by the agency or by a third party and that such conversion cannot be com-
pleted within ten (10) working days the time allotted for the response, the
agency shall so notify in writing the person requesting to examine or copy
the records. The agency shall provide the converted public record at a time
mutually agreed upon between the agency and the requester, with due consid-
eration given to any limitations that may exist due to the process of conver-
sion or due to the use of a third party to make the conversion.
(3) If the public agency or custodian fails to respond within the time
allotted for the response, the request shall be deemed to be denied within
ten (10) working days following the request.
(4) If the public agency denies the person's request for examination
or copying the public records or denies in part and grants in part the per-
son's request for examination and copying of the public records, the person


legally responsible for administering the public agency or that person's de-
signee shall notify the person in writing of the denial or partial denial of
the request for the public record.
(5) The notice of denial or partial denial shall state that the attorney
for the public agency has reviewed the request or shall state that the public
agency has had an opportunity to consult with an attorney regarding the re-
quest for examination or copying of a record and has chosen not to do so. The
notice of denial or partial denial also shall indicate the statutory author-
ity for the denial and indicate clearly the person's right to appeal the de-
nial or partial denial and the time periods for doing so.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-4126, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4126. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD. The board of trustees of the soci-
ety shall have powers and duties as follows:
1. To appoint a director of the society as provided herein and advise
him in the performance of his duties and formulate general policies affect-
ing the society.
2. To encourage and promote interest in the history of Idaho and encour-
age membership in the society.
3. To collect for preservation and display artifacts and information
illustrative of Idaho history, culture and society.
4. To print such publications and reports as may be deemed necessary.
5. To encourage creation of county historical societies and museums in
the counties of Idaho.
6. To facilitate the use of Idaho records for official reference and
historical research.
7. To be responsible for records management services for state gov-
ernment. Records management services include the management, storage and
retrieval of all state-created records under retention. State-created
records shall mean any document, book, paper photograph, sound recording
or other material, regardless of physical form or characteristic, made or
received pursuant to law or in connection with the transaction of official
state business. The board may charge reasonable amounts for records man-
agement services. The records managed pursuant to this subsection will
not be subject to the exemption in public records law provided in section
74-101(15) 74-101(16), Idaho Code.
8. To accept from any state, county, or city, or any public official,
any official books, records, documents, original papers, newspaper files,
printed books, or portraits, not in current use. When such documents are
so accepted, copies therefrom shall be made and certified under the seal of
the society upon application of any person, which person shall pay for such
copies reasonable fees established by the society.
9. To require that any state, county, or city, or any public official,
deposit official books, records, documents, or original papers, not in cur-
rent use, which are of definite historical importance, in the society for
preservation and to provide methods whereby such materials, which have no
significance, may be destroyed.
10. To establish such rules as may be necessary to discharge the duties
of the society.


11. To employ such personnel as may be necessary for the administration
of its duties in accordance with the rules of the administrator of the divi-
sion of human resources promulgated pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code.
12. To have and use an official seal.
13. To delegate and provide subdelegation of any such authority.
14. To identify historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural
sites, buildings, or districts, and to coordinate activities of local his-
toric preservation commissions.
15. To serve as the geographic names board of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.